Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7977.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 17-25.2 of the General Laws entitled "Ballot Question Advocacy and
Reporting" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
17-25.2-7.1. Disclaimers.
(a) No ballot question advocate shall make or incur an expenditure for any written, typed,
or other printed communication, unless such communication bears upon its face the words "Paid
for by" and the name of the person, entity, the name of its chief executive officer or equivalent, and
its principal business address. In the case of a person, business entity or political action committee
making or incurring such an expenditure, which entity is a tax-exempt organization under § 501(c)
of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (other than an organization described in § 501(c)(3) of such
Code) or an exempt nonprofit as defined in § 17-25-3, or any subsequent corresponding internal
revenue code of the United States, as amended from time to time, or an organization organized
under Section 527 of said code, such communication shall also bear upon its face the words "Top
Five Donors" followed by a list of the five (5) persons or entities making the largest aggregate
donations to such person, business entity or political action committee during the twelve (12) month
period before the date of such communication; provided that, no donor shall be listed who is not
required to be disclosed in a report to the board of elections by the person, business entity, or
political action committee.
(b) The provisions of subsections (a) of this section shall not apply to:
(1) Any editorial, news story, or commentary published in any newspaper, magazine or

journal on its own behalf and upon its own responsibility and for which it does not charge or receive
any compensation whatsoever;
(2) Political paraphernalia including pins, buttons, badges, emblems, hats, bumper stickers
or other similar materials; or
(3) Signs or banners with a surface area of not more than thirty-two square feet (32 ft2).
(c) No person, business entity or political action committee shall make or incur an
expenditure for paid television advertising or paid Internet video advertising, unless at the end of
such advertising there appears simultaneously, for a period of not less than four (4) seconds:
(1) A clearly identifiable video, photographic or similar image of the entity's chief
executive officer or equivalent; and
(2) A personal audio message, in the following form: "I am (name of entity's chief
executive officer or equivalent), (title) of (entity), and I approved its content."
(3) In the case of a person, business entity or political action committee making or incurring
such an expenditure, which person, business entity or political action committee is a tax-exempt
organization under § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (other than an organization
described in § 501(c)(3) of such Code) or an exempt nonprofit as defined in § 17-25-3, or any
subsequent corresponding internal revenue code if the United States, as amended from time to time,
or an organization organized under Section 527 of said code, such advertising shall also include a
written message in the following form: "The top five (5) donors to the organization responsible for
this advertisement are" followed by a list of the five (5) persons or entities making the largest
aggregate donations during the twelve (12) month period before the date of such advertisement;
provided that, no donor shall be listed who is not required to be disclosed in a report to the board
of elections by the person, business entity, or political action committee.
(d) No person, business entity or political action committee shall make or incur an
expenditure for paid radio advertising or paid Internet audio advertising, unless the advertising ends
with a personal audio statement by the entity's chief executive officer or equivalent:
(1) Identifying the entity paying for the expenditure; and
(2) A personal audio message, in the following form: "I am (name of entity's chief
executive officer or equivalent), (title), of (entity), and I approved its content."
(3) In the case of a person, business entity or political action committee making or incurring
such an expenditure, which entity is a tax-exempt organization under § 501(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986 (other than an organization described in § 501(c)(3) of such Code) or an
exempt nonprofit as defined in § 17-25-3, or any subsequent corresponding internal revenue code
of the United States, as amended from time to time, or an organization organized under Section 527
LC005594 - Page 2 of 4

of said code, such advertising shall also include:
(i) An audio message in the following form: "The top five (5) donors to the organization
responsible for this advertisement are" followed by a list of the five (5) persons or entities making
the largest aggregate donations during the twelve (12) month period before the date of such
advertisement; provided that, no donor shall be listed who is not required to be disclosed in a report
to the board of elections by the person, business entity, or political action committee; or
(ii) In the case of such an advertisement that is thirty (30) seconds in duration or shorter,
an audio message providing a website address that lists such five (5) persons or entities, provided
that no contributor shall be listed who is not required to be disclosed in a report to the board of
elections by the person, business entity, or political action committee. In such case, the person,
business entity or political action committee shall establish and maintain such a website with such
listing for the entire period during which such person, business entity or political action committee
makes such advertisement.
(e) No person, business entity or political action committee shall make or incur an
expenditure for automated telephone calls, unless the narrative of the telephone call identifies the
person, business entity or political action committee making the expenditure and its chief executive
officer or equivalent. In the case of a person, business entity or political action committee making
or incurring such an independent expenditure, which entity is a tax-exempt organization under§
501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of I 986 (other than an organization described in § 501(c)(3)
of such Code) or an exempt nonprofit as defined in § 17-25-3, or any subsequent corresponding
internal revenue code of the United States, as amended from time to time, or an organization
organized under Section 527 of said code, such narrative shall also include an audio message in the
following form: "The top five (5) donors to the organization responsible for this telephone call are"
followed by a list of the five (5) persons or entities making the largest aggregate donations during
the twelve (12) month period before the date of such telephone call; provided that, no donor shall
be listed who is not required to be disclosed in a report to the board of elections by the person,
business entity, or political action committee.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005594
========
LC005594 - Page 3 of 4